Louisiana, session 2026, HB314.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. For the purposes of this Act, the following definitions shall apply and
obtain:
(1) Unless otherwise provided herein, "tax recipient bodies" shall mean the city of
New Orleans, parish governing authorities, school boards, special taxing districts, and other
bodies which were eligible for reimbursement or payment from the Property Tax Relief
Fund prior to its abolition and repeal by Act 10 of the 1972 Extraordinary Session of the
Louisiana Legislature and any other taxing district listed in Sections 1(a)(3) and 1(a)(4) or
any other taxing district for any millage specified in Section 9(B) of this Act. In the parish
of Rapides, "tax recipient bodies" shall not include Red River Waterway District. In the
parish of Lafourche, "tax recipient bodies" shall not include the Atchafalaya Basin Levee
District, the Lafourche Basin Levee District, and Fresh Water District No. 1.
(2) "Tax recipient bodies" shall not include the millage levied by the various law
enforcement districts in the state in lieu of commissions as a result of Act 689 of the 1976
Regular Session of the Louisiana Legislature; however, law enforcement districts shall be
considered tax recipient bodies for any millage voted and levied for that purpose to the
extent specifically provided in Section 9(B) of this Act.
(3) "Tax recipient bodies" shall also mean those special taxing districts and other
bodies which were not eligible for reimbursement as provided in Section 1(a)(1) but which
had erroneously shared as a tax recipient body in the proceeds of Act 598 of the 1977
Regular Session and were subsequently determined by the state treasurer to be ineligible for
Page 1 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
such participation under the provisions of Act 592 of the 1978 Regular Session. The
exclusive listing of all such special taxing districts and other bodies is as follows:
Acadia
Mermentau River Harbor & Terminal
Allen
Elizabeth Recreation District #3
Kinder Recreation District #2--Maintenance
Hospital Service District #3--Maintenance
Ascension
Lighting District #6
Lighting District #7
Avoyelles
Red River Waterway District--Capital Outlay
Red River Waterway District--Operations
Beauregard
Waterworks District #3--Ward 4
Waterworks District #3--Ward Bienville
Fire Protection District #6
Hospital Service District #2
Caldwell
Columbia Heights Sewerage
Cameron
Cameron Water District #1--Maintenance
Water District #7--Maintenance
Grand Lake Recreation District--Maintenance
Water District #10--Maintenance
Fire District #10--Maintenance
Catahoula
Hospital District #2
Claiborne
Hospital District #1
Page 2 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Concordia
Recreation District #3--Maintenance
Fire Protection District #1
Evangeline
Cemetery Tax District--Ward 4
Cemetery Tax District #1
Cemetery Tax District #6
Water District #1--Maintenance
Evangeline Parish School Board
Consolidated School District No. 2
Evangeline Parish School Board
Consolidated School District No. 7
Grant
Hospital District #1
Recreational District #2
Jefferson
Ambulance Service #1
Community Center Playground District #1
Community Center Playground District #10
Community Center Playground District #11
Community Center Playground District #12
Community Center Playground District #13
Community Center Playground District #14
Community Center Playground District #15
Fire Protection District #5
Fire Protection District #6
Sewerage District #8
Sewerage District #9
Jefferson Hospital District #1
LaSalle
Sewer Maintenance
Page 3 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Recreation District #5
Livingston
Road Light District #2
Fire Protection District #1
Fire Protection District #4
Recreation District #3
Morehouse
Bastrop Area Fire District #2
Fire District #1--Ward 6
Fire District #1--Ward 10
Pointe Coupee
Sewerage District #1
Rapides
Waterworks #11A--Maintenance
Recreational--Maintenance
St. James
Road Light District #1A
Road Light District #2
Road Light District #4
St. Landry
Fire Protection District #3
St. Martin
Sewerage District
St. Mary
West St. Mary Parish Port Commission
St. Tammany
Fire District #4
Fire District #5
Fire District #7
Fire District #9
Fire District #10
Page 4 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Recreation District #2
Tangipahoa
Hospital District #1--Maintenance
Union
Hospital Service--Tri-Ward
Hospital Service--East Union
Vermilion
Ward 8 Public Cemetery
(4) "Tax recipient bodies" shall also mean the following special taxing districts and
other bodies which were not eligible for reimbursement as provided in Section 1(a)(1) and
which had never shared, except in the parishes of Bossier, East Baton Rouge, Ouachita and
Terrebonne, as a tax recipient body in the proceeds of state revenue sharing. The exclusive
listing of all such special taxing districts and other bodies is as follows:
Assumption
Road Lighting District #2
Bossier
Cypress Back Bayou Recreation Tax--Bonds/Maintenance
East Baton Rouge
Village St. George Fire District
Ouachita
Cooley Hospital Tax
Sterlington Sewerage District
Fire District No. 1--Maintenance
North Monroe Sewerage District No. 1--Maintenance
Road Light District #5
Road Light District #1
Road Light District #3
Road Light District #4
East Ouachita Recreational District
Page 5 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Terrebonne
Road Lighting District No. 4
Road Lighting District No. 5--Maintenance
Road Lighting District No. 6
Road Lighting District No. 8--Maintenance
Road Lighting District No. 9--Maintenance
Road Lighting District No. 10--Maintenance
Fire Protection District No. 4-A--Maintenance
Fire Protection District No. 5--Maintenance
Fire Protection District No. 8--Maintenance
Fire Protection District No. 10--Maintenance
Sanitation District No. 1--Maintenance
Recreation District No. 1--Maintenance
Recreation District No. 4--Maintenance
Road Lighting District No. 1--Maintenance
Road Lighting District No. 2--Maintenance
Road Lighting District No. 3A
Fire Protection District No. 123--Maintenance
Fire Protection District No. 9--Maintenance
Road Lighting District No. 7--Maintenance
St. Tammany
Mosquito District No. 2(A)--10 mills
Mosquito District No. 2(B)--10 mills
(5)(a) In addition to the limitations herein above set forth, "tax recipient bodies" for
purposes of this Act shall be tax recipient bodies within the meaning of Article VII, Section
26 of the Constitution of Louisiana, limited solely to those taxes authorized prior to January
1, 1978, and any renewals thereof, or any millage authorized prior to January 1, 1978, but
not levied in full or part on the tax rolls. In Orleans Parish this limitation shall apply solely
to those taxes authorized and collected prior to January 1, 1978.
(b) "Population" shall mean that enumeration of persons within the state, its
parishes, and incorporated municipalities determined by the Louisiana State University and
Page 6 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Agricultural and Mechanical College Agriculture Center, Department of Agricultural
Economics and Agribusiness, under the most recent federal-state cooperative program for
local population estimates. Such determination shall be submitted to the state treasurer
annually not later than January fifteenth of each calendar year. Any tax recipient body or
incorporated municipality which is aggrieved by such determination may file a petition for
administrative review with the state treasurer not later than March fifteenth of each calendar
year hereafter. The estimates so submitted shall have no effect on the distribution for the
fiscal year in which they are made but shall be utilized for purposes of this Act and for
distribution during the ensuing fiscal year. The treasurer shall have authority to affirm,
modify, or set aside in whole or in part, the determination of the Louisiana State University
and Agricultural and Mechanical College Agriculture Center, Department of Agricultural
Economics and Agribusiness.
(c) "Homesteads" shall mean that enumeration of homestead exemption claims filed
with the assessors as determined by the Louisiana Tax Commission as of November fifteenth
of the current calendar year from the original tax rolls submitted to the commission prior to
any adjustments thereto.
(d) "Public school population" shall mean the enumeration of enrollments contained
in the Department of Education Annual Report for the preceding school year.
(e) "City of New Orleans", unless otherwise indicated herein, shall mean only the
city of New Orleans, the Orleans Levee District or its successor, the Sewerage and Water
Board of New Orleans, the assessor for Orleans Parish, and the Orleans Parish School Board
and reference in this Act to tax recipient bodies in the city of New Orleans shall refer only
to the aforesaid entities.
Section 2. The revenue sharing fund for the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 shall consist of
the sum of Ninety Million and No/100 ($90,000,000.00) Dollars.
Section 3. The amount to be distributed annually to each parish from the revenue
sharing fund shall be the sum of (a) an amount equal to that percentage of eighty percent of
the total fund which is equal to the ratio which the population of the parish bears to the total
state population, and (b) an amount equal to that percentage of twenty percent of the total
fund which is equal to the ratio which the number of homesteads in the parish bears to the
total number of homesteads in the state. As used in this Section, the term "homesteads" shall
Page 7 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
mean that enumeration of adjusted homestead exemption claims filed with the assessors as
determined by the Louisiana Tax Commission as of March thirty-first of the current calendar
year.
Section 4. Except as provided in Section 5, the state treasurer shall distribute the
funds herein allocated to the tax collectors of the respective parishes and to the city of New
Orleans.
Section 5. That portion of the fund for the parish of Ouachita allocated to the
Monroe City School Board shall be an amount which will reimburse said board, to the extent
available and subject to the provisions of Section 9(C) of this Act, for the taxes lost as a
result of homestead exemptions based on the tax rolls for the current calendar year and shall
be distributed directly to the city treasurer of the city of Monroe, who shall pay therefrom
the statutorily dedicated deductions for retirement systems. For the purpose of distribution
of the balance of the revenue sharing funds the state treasurer may use the amount listed on
the prior year Ouachita Parish tax rolls which were due the Monroe City School Board.
Section 6. Eleven and nine-tenths percent of all revenue sharing funds distributed
by the provisions of this Act, excluding such funds as are distributed directly to the city of
New Orleans and the amount listed on the prior year Ouachita Parish tax rolls which were
due the Monroe City School Board ($1,164,955), shall form a special fund ($9,866,728) to
be distributed as commissions to the tax collectors of the respective parishes, the city of New
Orleans excepted. Each such tax collector shall receive a percentage of such fund, based on
commissions received by him pursuant to Act 153 of the 1973 Regular Session, as provided
in Section 8 of this Act.
Section 7.A. Two and forty-four hundredths percent of all revenue sharing funds
distributed by the provisions of this Act, excluding such funds as are distributed directly to
the city of New Orleans and the amount listed on the prior year Ouachita tax rolls which
were due the Monroe City School Board ($1,164,955), shall form a special fund
($2,023,094) to be distributed to the various retirement systems which were eligible for
payment pursuant to Act 153 of the 1973 Regular Session, as provided in Section 8 of this
Act for distribution to such retirement systems, and shall make due payment thereof to each
retirement system in the same proportion that the statutory deduction provided by law for
the system bears to the total statutory deductions provided by law for all such retirement
Page 8 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
systems. For the purpose of distributing these retirement contributions, the state treasurer
may use the statutory deductions determined by the Public Retirement Systems Actuarial
Committee as per R.S. 11:103 for the previous calendar year.
B. The city of New Orleans shall make the deductions legally established for
retirement systems which were eligible for payment pursuant to Act 153 of the 1973 Regular
Session and shall make due payment in accordance with the statutory deductions provided
by law for all such retirement systems. Notwithstanding the above provisions the city of
New Orleans shall remit the following amounts for the indicated retirement systems for
Fiscal Year 2026-2027: Assessors' Retirement Fund, $168,474; Clerks of Court Retirement
and Relief Fund, $137,015; District Attorneys' Retirement System, $67,281; Registrars of
Voters Employees' Retirement System, $64,443; Sheriffs' Pension and Relief Fund, $55,762.
Section 8. The respective percentages to be used in calculating tax collectors'
commissions and retirement system distributions shall be as follows:
PARISH SHERIFF RETIREMENT
Acadia 1.491% 1.047%
Allen .739% .475%
Ascension 1.283% .985%
Assumption .871% .399%
Avoyelles 1.263% .811%
Beauregard .842% .583%
Bienville .596% .405%
Bossier 1.705% 2.281%
Caddo 5.490% 10.375%
Calcasieu 4.719% 6.051%
Caldwell .473% .319%
Cameron .498% .400%
Catahoula .468% .303%
Claiborne .543% .326%
Concordia .730% .486%
DeSoto .547% .349%
East Baton Rouge 7.118% 11.977%
Page 9 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
East Carroll .443% .331%
East Feliciana .489% .238%
Evangeline .730% .525%
Franklin .731% .757%
Grant .614% .357%
Iberia 2.221% 1.847%
Iberville 1.391% .810%
Jackson .653% .495%
Jefferson 13.312% 13.856%
Jefferson Davis .693% .766%
Lafayette 3.081% 2.843%
Lafourche 1.928% 1.958%
LaSalle .548% .349%
Lincoln .727% .922%
Livingston 1.679% 1.322%
Madison .443% .401%
Morehouse 1.001% .907%
Natchitoches 1.072% .775%
Ouachita 2.736% 3.200%
Plaquemines 1.436% 1.241%
Pointe Coupee .641% .422%
Rapides 3.250% 3.751%
Red River .421% .147%
Richland .655% .683%
Sabine .685% .517%
St. Bernard 3.467% 3.005%
St. Charles 1.060% .959%
St. Helena .446% .291%
St. James .928% .759%
St. John the Baptist 1.184% .704%
St. Landry 2.740% 2.013%
Page 10 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
St. Martin 1.121% .626%
St. Mary 1.895% 1.826%
St. Tammany 2.752% 2.396%
Tangipahoa 2.773% 1.863%
Tensas .343% .266%
Terrebonne 2.233% 2.175%
Union .590% .409%
Vermilion 1.220% 1.004%
Vernon 1.627% 1.112%
Washington 1.349% .922%
Webster 1.068% 1.131%
West Baton Rouge .747% .516%
West Carroll .464% .466%
West Feliciana .404% .188%
Winn .633% .377%
Section 9. All remaining funds shall be allocated and distributed as follows:
A. Subject to the provisions of Subsection B of this Section and except as provided
by Section 5, the tax collector of each parish and the city of New Orleans shall allocate and
distribute, within fifteen days after receipt thereof, to the tax recipient bodies within his
jurisdiction an amount available after commissions and deductions which is necessary to
offset losses attributable to homestead exemptions. In any parish which had excess funds
in 1977, the amount available for the reimbursement of homestead exemption losses shall
be limited to the amount used for that purpose in 1977, adjusted by the percentage by which
the number of homesteads in the parish increased or decreased from 1977 to 2023, together
with any additional taxing bodies or millages authorized to participate on the same pro rata
basis under the provisions of Section 1(a)(3), Section 1(a)(4), and Section 9(B) of this Act.
This restriction shall not apply to the parish of East Carroll and to parishes in which there
were no excess funds in 1977. However, in the city of New Orleans the amount available
for the reimbursement of homestead exemption losses shall be limited to the amount used
for that purpose in 1977, except that the amount distributed to the Orleans Levee District or
its successor shall be limited solely to the amount used for the reimbursement of homestead
Page 11 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
exemption losses in 1977 on the Orleans Levee District's two mill tax. The remaining
amount shall be adjusted by the percentage by which the number of homesteads in the city
of New Orleans increased or decreased from 1977 to 2023, together with any additional
taxing bodies or millages authorized to participate on the same pro rata basis under the
provisions of Subsection B of this Section.
B. For purposes of this Subsection only, "tax recipient bodies" shall mean and
include any recipient of funds hereunder, but limited solely to such specified disbursements.
The millages listed are included solely as an identification aid for administrative purposes
and the new tax approved by the electorate shall be eligible for distribution hereunder,
regardless of fluctuations in millage caused by adjustments for reassessment or other
purposes. In no event shall any amount be deemed available within the meaning of Article
VII, Section 26 of the Constitution of Louisiana to reimburse losses attributable to
homestead exemptions for taxes authorized after January 1, 1978, and any renewals thereof,
with the following basic exceptions:
(1) In the parish of Sabine, all millages listed on the tax roll, except the sheriff's
original millage, shall share on a pro rata basis.
(2) In the parish of DeSoto, all school board taxes authorized after January 1, 1978,
and prior to the convening of the 1979 Regular Session, the 7 mill parishwide school tax
authorized May 2, 1987, the 37 mill school special tax authorized October 24, 1987, the
assessor's original millage, the maintenance taxes for Fire Protection Districts Nos. 1, 5, 8,
and 9 prior to 1990, the 7 mill tax authorized in 1994 for Fire District #2, the additional 8.37
mill tax authorized on November 7, 1978, for the parish law enforcement district, the 1 mill
tax authorized April 5, 1997, for Water District #1, the 3 mills tax authorized November 21,
2002, for the parish library, and the 1 mill tax authorized July 16, 1994, for the
Communications District 911 System, shall share on a pro rata basis with all other tax
recipient bodies in the parish. The parish road maintenance tax which lapsed in 1983 and
which was reauthorized at 5 mills in 1984 shall share on a pro rata basis with all other tax
recipient bodies in the parish.
(3) In the parish of Bossier, after full reimbursement of all taxes authorized prior to
May 1, 1978, to all other tax recipient bodies in the parish including the additional 3 mills
Page 12 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
authorized on April 5, 1980, for the law enforcement district and the assessor's original
millage, the following new millages shall be reimbursed to the extent available:
School Board District 13--11.63 mills/September 16, 1978
School Board District 3--15.1 mills/September 16, 1978
(4) In the parish of Grant, all new millages authorized prior to January 1, 1989, the
10.9 mill tax authorized January 16, 1999, for the library, the millage authorized October 7,
1989, for Fire District No. 1, the 15 mill tax authorized in 1995 for Fire District #3, the
additional mills for the law enforcement district and the assessor's original millage, but
excluding bond millages, shall share on a pro rata basis with all other tax recipient bodies
in the parish.
(5) In the parish of Webster, after full reimbursement of all taxes authorized prior
to January 1, 1978, to all other tax recipient bodies in the parish and the assessor's original
millage, the following new millages shall be reimbursed to the extent available:
Doyline School District No. 7--33.32 mills/August 1, 1979
Consolidated School District No. 3--10.51 mills/June 1, 1978
Minden School District No. 6--32.9 mills/May 1, 1980
Parish Library–12 mills/November 2004
(6) In the parish of Vernon, all taxes authorized after January 1, 1978, including the
additional 7 mills authorized on April 4, 1981, for the law enforcement district, but
excluding the sheriff's original millage, shall share on a pro rata basis with all other tax
recipient bodies in the parish.
(7) In the parish of East Baton Rouge, the B.R.E.C. Maintenance and Operation and
Capital Improvement millages shall be limited to a total of 5.44 mills.
(8) In the parish of Lafourche, the total parish allocation, excluding the tax
collector's commission and the retirement systems' deductions shall form a special fund to
be distributed as follows:
Parish Council - 57.40%
School Board - 27.25%
South Lafourche Levee District - 2.95%
Port Commission - 2.06%
Assessor - 3.32%
Page 13 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Bayou Lafourche Fresh Water District - 2.82%
North Lafourche Levee District - 4.20%
Provided, however, that of the funds distributed to the Bayou Lafourche Fresh Water
District in any state fiscal year, no less than Ten Thousand ($10,000) Dollars shall be used
for the abatement of water hyacinth and other noxious vegetation within the jurisdiction of
the district in Lafourche Parish.
(a) Of the amount distributed to the parish the following allocations shall be made:
Bayou Blue Fire District - 0.42%
Drainage District No. 1 - 0.90%
Drainage District No. 5 - 0.65%
Fire District No. 1 - 0.57%
Fire District No. 2 - 0.59%
Fire District No. 3 - 1.30%
Fire District No. 9 - 0.42%
Lafourche Ambulance District No. 1 - .61%
Recreation District No. 2 - 2.81%
Water District No. 1 - 3.02%
Health Unit - 3.04%
Recreation Commission - 5.05%
Recreation District No. 1 - 0.96%
Recreation District No. 8 - 0.61%
Drainage - 10.14%
Road Lighting - 4.24%
Public Buildings - 6.19%
Library - 6.24%
Criminal - 0.24%
Road District #1 - 5.46%
Drainage 1 of 12 - 0.20%
Drainage 2 of 12 - 0.11%
Drainage 3 of 12 - 0.14%
Juvenile Justice - 1.47%
Page 14 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
(b) The amount distributed to the school board shall be allocated as follows:
Schools - 24.31%
Special Education - 2.94%
(9) In the parish of Calcasieu, the total parish allocation, excluding the tax collector's
commission and the retirement systems' deductions, shall form a special fund to be
distributed as follows:
Police Jury--48.5%
School Board--29.4%
Sheriff--11.9%
Police Jury--5.0% to be distributed to the district attorney
Lake Charles Harbor and Terminal District--2.8%
Assessor--2.3%
Vinton Harbor and Terminal District--0.1%.
(10) In the parish of Iberville, the library's 1996 millage shall be limited to 2.9 mills.
(11) In the parish of St. Bernard, the assessor's millage shall be limited to 1.47 mills.
(12) In the parish of Livingston, the library's 1995 millage shall be limited to 3.48
mills, the assessor's millage shall be limited to 2.56 mills, and the Juvenile Detention
Center's 1995 millage shall be limited to .44 mills, the #2 Fire District's millage shall be
limited to .81 mills, the #8 Fire District's millage shall be limited to 1.91 mills, and the #9
Fire District's millage shall be limited to 1.96 mills.
(13) In the parish of Assumption, the total parish allocation, excluding the tax
collector's commission and the retirement systems' deductions, shall form a special fund to
be distributed as follows:
Law Enforcement District - 30.77%
Police Jury - 30.25%
School Board - 28.72%
Assessment District - 10.26%
(14) The following new millages shall share on a pro rata basis with all other tax
recipient bodies in their respective parishes:
Acadia
Bayou des Cannes-Nepique Gravity Drainage District--10 mills/1996
Page 15 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
5th Ward Gravity Drainage District--5 mills/April, 1980
Iota-Long Point Gravity Drainage--0.40 mills/October 27, 1979
Bayou Mallett Gravity Drainage--0.73 mills/April 5, 1980
6th Ward and Crowley Dist. Maint.--1.29 mills/Dec. 8, 1979
Basile School District #7 Maintenance--3.32 mills/May 19, 1979
Acadia-St. Landry Hospital District--7 mills/November 2, 1982
Bayou Plaquemine-Wikoff Drainage--5 mills/Jan. 21, 1984
Library--4.25 mills/Jan. 19, 1985
Road Maintenance--3 mills/Nov. 28, 1981
Health Unit Mt.--1.06 mills/Nov. 28, 1981
Fire District #4 Maintenance – 8 mills/January 16, 1999
Assessor's original millage
Fire District #6 Maintenance–8.01 mills/June 15, 2000
Allen
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--6.47 mills/April 11, 1992
Assessor--5.23 mills/1990
Road Dist. #1--4.86 mills/1992
Road Dist. #1--20.69 mills/1995
Road Dist. #1A--8 mills/1995
Road District No. 2 Maintenance--7 mills/October 6, 1990
Road District No. 2 Maintenance--10 mills/July 18, 1992
Road District No. 2 Bridge Maint.--5 mills/July 18, 1992
Road District No. 3 Maintenance--8.18 mills/March 10, 1992
Road District No. 3 Maintenance--10 mills/January 20, 1990
Road Dist. #3--30 mills/1995
Road Dist. #4--21.12 mills/1995
Road District No. 4 Maintenance--30 mills/March 10, 1992
Library -- 10.76 mills/October 2002
Courthouse and Jail--4 mills/November 6, 2012
Road District 5--5.30 mills/November 6, 2012
Page 16 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Ascension
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--5 mills/Nov. 4, 1980
Library Maintenance/Library--5.6 mills
East Asc. Gravity Drainage Dist.--5 mills/January 20, 1979
West Asc. Gravity Drainage Dist.--5 mills/November 4, 1980
West Ascension Gravity Drainage Dist.-- 4.67 mills/2000
Mental Health -- 2 mills/2000
Road Lighting District No. 1--5 mills/ January 16, 1993
Road Lighting District No. 2--5 mills/ January 16, 1993
Road Lighting District No. 3--5 mills/ January 16, 1993
Road Lighting District No. 4--5 mills/ January 16, 1993
Road Lighting District No. 5--5 mills/ January 16, 1993
Road Lighting District No. 6--5 mills/ January 16, 1993
Road Lighting District No. 7--5 mills/ September 27, 1986
Prairieville Fire District #3--11 mills/ July 16, 2005
Prairieville Fire District #3--10 mills/April 2, 2011
Assessor's original millage
Avoyelles
All millages listed on the tax roll, except the sheriff's original millage, shall share on
a pro rata basis.
Beauregard
Law Enforcement District--5 mills/April 5, 1980
Assessor's original millage
Bienville
Solid Waste--6 mills/April 7, 1984
Assessor's 1997 millage
Caddo
Fire Protection District No. 1--5 mills/July 16, 1983
Juvenile Court--0.12 mills/January 16, 1982
Jail Facilities--4.00 mills/April 5, 1980
Courthouse Maintenance--3.00 mills/January 16, 1982
Page 17 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Law Enforcement District (Cont. Ser.)--4.00 mills/April 30, 1983
Library--4.90 mills/April, 1988
Library--5.26 mills/April 1996
Fire Dist. No. 2--10 mills/April 7, 1984
Fire Dist. No. 3--10 mills/Sept. 29, 1984
Fire Dist. No. 4--10 mills/Nov. 6, 1984
Fire Dist. No. 5--10 mills/Nov. 6, 1984
Fire Dist. No. 6--10 mills/Jan. 19, 1985
Fire Dist. No. 7--10 mills
Fire Dist. No. 8--4 mills/1999
Fire Dist. No. 9--10 mills/Nov. 18, 1989
Fire Dist. No. 1--10 mills/1989
School Board Operations--11 mills/May 4, 1985
Public Works--6 mills/November 4, 1986
Public Facilities--0.92 mills
Jail--2 mills
Assessor's original millage
Parish Health Unit--1 mill/1990
Caddo Detention Center--3 mills/1990
Law Enforcement District--3 mills/November 6, 1990
Law Enforcement District--3.0 mills/October 16, 1993
BioMedical--2 mills/1993
Criminal Justice System--1.82 mills/October 20, 2001
Caldwell
Assessor's original millage
Recreation Maintenance--November 1995
Road Maintenance--May 1990
Cameron
Law Enforcement District (Add.)--8 mills/April 7, 1990
Assessor's original millage
Page 18 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Catahoula
All millages listed on the tax roll, except the sheriff's original millage, shall share on
a pro rata basis.
Claiborne
Assessment District
School District #13--12 mills/November 2, 1982
Law Enforcement District--6.25 mills/July 21, 1990
School Board Maintenance--2 mills/April 5, 1986
School Board Operations--5 mills/April 5, 1986
Police Jury Building--2 mills/March 30, 1985
Road, Street & Bridge Maintenance--1993
Road Equipment--1993
Concordia
School Operation & Maintenance--23.25 mills/September, 1982
Library--All millages
Assessor's original millage
Law Enforcement District--12 mills/April 11, 1992
Highway, Drainage and Courthouse Maintenance--10 mills/October 16, 1993
East Baton Rouge
Fire Protection #6 (Hooper Rd.)--10 mills/November 6, 1984
Fire Protection #3 (Brownsfield)--10 mills/November 6, 1984
Fire Protection #4 (Central)– 10 mills/October 8, 1985
Zachary Constitutional School -- 5 mills/November 15, 2003
Baker Constitutional School -- 5 mills/November 15, 2003
East Carroll
Garbage District No. 1--7 mills/November 4, 1980
Parish Library--6.5 mills/May 22, 1989
Parish Health Unit--3 mills
Rural Fire District Maintenance--2 mills
Courthouse Maintenance--2 mills
Road Maintenance and Construction--0.75 mills/March 26, 1983
Page 19 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Drainage Maintenance and Construct.--0.75 mills/March 26, 1983
East Carroll Hospital Service Dist.--5 mills/May 5, 1984
Assessor's original millage
East Feliciana
Assessment District, 1997
Evangeline
Consolidated School Dist. #2--9.47 mills/May 19, 1979
Basile New School Dist. #7--3.32 mills/May 19, 1979
Elderly Services--1 mill/Nov. 4, 1980
Ward 5 Fire Protection District--11.17 mills
Pine Prairie Fire Protection District--8.95 mills/Nov. 3, 1992
Acadia-Evangeline Fire Protection District--0.97 mills
Mamou Fire Protection District No. 1--8.0 mills/April, 1995
Fire District No. 2 -- 5 mills/1999
District Two Cemetery--1.07 mills
District Three Cemetery--1.07 mills
District Seven Cemetery--1.01 mills
Road District Two--10.00 mills (Additional)
Road District No. 5--10 mills/1997
Ward One Cemetery--1 mill/1997
Ward Four Cemetery--1 mill/1997
Ward Five Cemetery--1 mill/1997
Road District Three--.48 mills/1987 and 5.0 mills/1996
Road District Four--10.00 mills (Additional)
Mamou Gravity Drainage District No. 5--1.56 mills
Prairie Mamou Gravity Drainage District No. 8--3.42 mills
Durald Gravity Drainage District No. 4
Vidrine Gravity Drainage District No. 7
Assessor's original millage
Lone Pine Fire District–20 mills/November 21, 2012
Page 20 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Franklin
Law Enforcement District--10 mills/July 10, 1982
Assessor's original millage
Library--7 mills/1990
Health Unit--3.0 mills/November 6, 1990
Parish Equipment--8.0 mills/October 16, 1993
Drainage Maintenance--11 mills/October 16, 1993
Courthouse Maintenance--4 mills/October 16, 1993
Iberia
Recreation District No. 8--1.85 mills/November 13, 1993
Assessment District
Iberville
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--5 mills/December 8, 1979
Assessor's original millage
Jackson
Additional Support to Public Sch.--7.07 mills/July 28, 1979
Law Enforcement District--8 mills/May 16, 1981
Library--All millages
Assessment district
Jefferson
West Jefferson Levee District--All millages
Consolidated Waterworks District No. 1--3.54 mills/October 19, 2013
Consolidated Sewerage District No. 1--3.58 mills/October 19, 2013
Lafayette
Lafayette Parish Public Library--1.09 mills/May, 1979
School Board--10 mills/May 4, 1985
Lafayette Parish Sheriff--5.0 mills/May, 1980
Assessor's original millage
Bayou Vermilion District--All maintenance taxes prior to 1990
LaSalle
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--8.2 mills
Page 21 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Library--November 1995
Road District 2B--3.09 mills/April 16, 1988
Road District 2BN--1.03 mills/April 16, 1988
Ambulance Tax--0.65 mills
Road and Bridge--0.66 mills
Health Unit--0.23 mills
Fair Tax--0.09 mills
Special B & C 1A--0.19 mills
Sewer Maintenance--6.04 mills
Fire District--5.32 mills
Little Creek-Searcy Volunteer Fire District -- 20 mills
Summerville-Rosefield Volunteer Fire District -- 20 mills
Eden-Fellowship Volunteer Fire District -- 9.79 mills
Whitehall Volunteer Fire District -- Operations -- 10 mills
Whitehall Volunteer Fire District -- Maintenance -- 10 mills
Recreation District #22--1.05 mills
Assessor's original millage
Lincoln
Library Const./Mt.--0.75 Mills/January 21, 1978
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--8.5 mills/July 22,1992
School-Special Maint. & Oper.--0.15 mills/May 18, 1979
School-Special Repair & Equip.--0.15 mills/May 18, 1979
Library--0.71 mills/January 15, 1983
Assessor's original millage
Livingston
Law Enforcement District (Special)--12.19 mills/1976
Recreation District #3--2 mills/May 19, 1979
School District No. 5--5 mills/November 2, 1982
Fire District No. 1--10.04 mills/1986
Fire District No. 5--10 mills/Nov. 6, 1984
Fire District No. 7 -- 5 mills/1999
Page 22 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Fire District No. 10--10.33 mills/1985
Fire District No. 11--All millages
Roads & Bridges--5 mills/November 3, 1992
Madison
Assessor's original millage
Morehouse
Bastrop Area Fire Pro. Dist. No. 2--2 mills/Nov. 7, 1978
Assessor's original millage
Library--1 mill/ Jan. 20, 1990
Natchitoches
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--10 mills/May 16, 1981
Fire District No. 6--7 mills
Parish Ambulance Tax
Fire District No. 7--10 mills
Goldonna Area Fire Protection Dist. No. 2
Library--3 mills/1988
Assessor's original millage
City of New Orleans
Board of Assessors' original millage
Ouachita
Law Enforcement District (Add.)--7.85 mills/Oct. 17, 1981
Ouachita Parish Road Lighting District No. 1 (Lakeshore Area)
Ouachita Parish Assessment District
Green Oaks Juvenile Detention Home -- 3.75 mills/1996
Library -- 7.75 mills/1995
Plaquemines
School Board Tax--6 (4 Maint./2 Sal.) mills/November 19, 1983
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--5 mills/May 4, 1985
Water--2.47 mills in 1992
Library--1.24 mills in 1992
Pollution Control--2.47 mills in 1992
Page 23 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Road Maintenance--1.86 mills in 1992
Public Health--1.24 mills in 1992
Waste Disposal--3.69 mills in 1992
Incineration--1.24 mills in 1992
Hospital--2.54 mills in 1992
Law Enforcement Jail Fac. Prop. I--6 mills/October 3, 1992
Assessor's original millage
Pointe Coupee
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--10 mills/April 4, 1981
School Board--5.83 mills/April 4, 1981
Library--1.22 mills/April 4, 1981
Fire Protection Dist. #1--All maint. millages prior to 1991
Fire Protection District #2--3 mills/October 17, 1981
Fire Protection District #3--3 mills/October 17, 1981
Fire Protection District #4--3 mills/October 17, 1981
Fire Protection District #5--5 mills/October 17, 1981
Sewerage Dist. No. 1 Mt.--5 mills/July 9, 1977 (levied 1980)
Assessor's original millage
Rapides
Rapides Parish School Board--.20 mills/April 1, 1978
Rapides Parish School Board--15.20 mills/May 13, 1978
Gravity Drainage District #1 Main.--1 mill/October 17, 1981
Road District 1A (Ward 4)
Road District 2C
Road District 3A
Road District 5A
Road District 6A (Ward 6)
Road District 7A (Ward 7)
Road District 36 (Ward 8)
Road District 9B (Ward 9)
Road District 10A (Ward 10)
Page 24 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Road District 2B (Ward 11)
Fire District #8 (Maint.)--20 mills/April 30,1983
School District No. 11 (Ward 10)--2 mills/May 7, 1980
School District No. 50 (Ward 11)--2 mills/September 11, 1982
School Dist. No. 51 (Ward 5)--All maint. millages prior to 1990
Consolidated School Dist. No. 62--4.02 mills/April 4, 1987
Consolidated School Dist. No. 62--4.00 mills/April 16, 1988
Fire District No. 5--20 mills/Nov. 4, 1986
Fire District No. 3--12 mills/Oct. 19, 1985
Fire District No. 7--6 mills/May 3, 1986
Fire District No. 9
Fire District No. 10--20 mills/Nov. 4, 1986
Fire District No. 11
Fire District No. 12
Assessor's original millage
Plainview Fire District No. 10--10 mills/1990
Fire District #4
Fire District #7
Senior Citizens
Buckeye Recreational District
Flatwoods Fire District
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--Nov. 6, 1984
Fire District No. 6--20 mills
Library--6.0 mills/January 15, 1994
Library--1.00 mill/September 30, 2006
Recreational District Ward 9--6.14 mills/November 17, 2001
Red River
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--5 mills/April 5, 1980
St. Bernard
St. Bernard Port, Harbor and Terminal District--All millages
Library--All millages
Page 25 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
St. Charles
Law Enforcement District (Add.)--7.75 mills/Nov. 4, 1980
Library--3 mills/September 27, 1986
Law Enforcement District –3.75 mills/July 16, 2005
Assessor's original millage
St. Helena
Parishwide Road District Maintenance
Road District #1 Maintenance
Sub-Road District #2 of Road District #2 Maintenance
Road District #3 Maintenance
Road District #4 Maintenance
Road District #5 Maintenance
Road District #6 Maintenance
Parish Library
Fire Protection District #5 Maintenance
Law Enforcement District--10 mills/May 3, 1986
Assessor's original millage
Sub-Road District #1 of Road District #2
Fire Protection District #2
Fire Protection District #3
Florida Parishes Juvenile Detention Center--3 mills/1995
St. James
St. James Hospital Board--4.31 mills/May 18, 1979
Gramercy Recreation District--5 mills/May 18, 1979
Law Enforcement District--6.00 mills/July 16, 1988
Assessment District, 1985
St. John
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--15.18 mills/May 17, 1980
Assessor's original millage
St. Landry
Gravity Drainage District No. 1 of Ward 2
Page 26 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Fire District #3
Fire District #2
Fire District No. 5
St. Landry Parish School Board--12 mills/May 3, 1986
Jail Maintenance Tax--1 mill/April 30, 2011
Fire District No. 6
Acadia-St. Landry Hospital District--7 mills/November 2, 1982
Road District #11A, Sub-1--10.00 mills/1993
Road District #11-A, Sub-2 Maintenance--5 mills/April 30, 1983
Road District #3, Ward 1, Sub-1 Main.--10 mills/Jan. 21, 1984
Road District #12, Ward 2--2.65 mills/January 1, 1979
Road District #1, Ward 3
Road District #4--10 mills/July 21, 2001
Road District #5--15 mills/1993
Road District #6--15 mills/ May 4, 2002
Assessor's original millage
South St. Landry Comm. Library Dist.--5.75 mills/Nov. 16, 1991
Fire District #1
St. Martin
Assessor's original millage
St. Mary
Wax Lake East Drainage District
Sub Gravity Drainage District of Wax Lake East
Assessor--2.9 mills/1982
Hospital Service District No. 1--7.88 mills/1999
Hospital Service District No. 1--6 mills/1999
Hospital Service District No. 1--3.47 mills/2003
St. Tammany
All millages listed on the tax roll, and in particular the parish library millages
authorized on April 5, 1980, and May 5, 1984, with the exception of the sheriff's original
millage, shall share on a pro rata basis.
Page 27 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Tangipahoa
Road Lighting District No. 2--5 mills/July 21, 1990
Library--.60 mills/1984
Library Maint.--2.60 mills/May 4, 1985
Garbage District # 1 Maint.--10 mills/March 26, 1983
Road District # 7 Maint.--5 mills/Sept. 11, 1982
Fire Dist. #1--2.10 mills/1978
Fire Protection District No. 1--7 mills/1998
Fire Dist. #1--5.65 mills/1996
Fire Protection District # 2--10 mills/May 5, 1984 (2 taxes)
Fire Dist. #2--10 mills/1996
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--10 mills
Drainage District #4 Maint.--3 mills/April 30, 1983
Assessor's original millage
Gravity Drainage District No. 5--5 mills/April 7, 1990
Florida Parishes Juvenile Detention Center--3 mills/1995
Pontchatoula Recreation Dist.--10 mills/1996
Independence Recreation Dist.--15 mills/1996
Hammond Alternate School -- 3 mills/1996
Hammond Recreation District No. 1 – 10 Mills/November 10, 2010
Tensas
Gravity Drainage Dist. No. 2--3 mills/October 3, 1992
Medical Services--12 mills/February 28, 1987
Assessor's additional millage--1988
Terrebonne
All millages listed on the tax roll, except the sheriff's original millage, shall share a
pro rata basis.
Vermilion
Subroad Dist. No. 5 of Road Dist. No. 2--5 mills/1979
Road District No. 3--5 mills/1979
Subroad Dist. No. 2 of Road Dist. No. 2--5 mills/1979
Page 28 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Library -- 1.12 mills/1994
Washington
Washington Schools Spec. Main./Op.--0.90 mills/1984
School District #2 Maintenance--0.98 mills/1981
School District #2 Support--0.98 mills/1981
Bogalusa City Schools Main./Op.--23 mills/1989
Library--4.57 mills/1987
Angie School--5 mills/1990
Assessor's millage
Rich. FD #2 -- 8 mills/1998
Bonner Creek Fire Dist.--8.46 mills/1987
Bonner Creek Fire Dist.--5 mills/1996
Spring Hill Fire Dist. #8--5.73 mills/1995
Spring Hill Fire District #8 -- 6 mills/1998
Mt. Herman Fire Dist. #9--16 mills/1995
Pine Fire Dist. #4--10 mills/1995
Angie Fire Dist. #5--10 mills/1992
Varnado Fire Dist. #6--10 mills/1992
Fire Dist. #7--5 mills/1996
Fire Dist. #7--12.27 mills/1992
Hayes Creek Fire District #3--17 mills/1999
Florida Parishes Juvenile Detention Center--3 mills/1995
West Baton Rouge
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--5 mills/1980
Assessment District of West Baton Rouge Parish–1.35 mills/1985
West Carroll
Ward 1 Road Maintenance--5.45 mills
Ward 2 Road Maintenance--4.59 mills
Ward 2 Special Tax--Road District #2--2.75 mills
Ward 3 Road Maintenance--4.96 mills
Ward 3 Special Tax--Road Dist. #3--2.98 mills
Page 29 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Ward 4 Road Maintenance--Road Dist. No. 4-4--4.20 mills
Ward 4 Road Maintenance--Road Dist. No. 4-6--5.28 mills
Ward 4 Special Tax--Road Dist. #4-4--2.52 mills
Ward 4 Special Tax--Road Dist. #4-6--3.17 mills
Ward 5 Road Maintenance--4.78 mills
Ward 5 Special Tax--Road Dist. No. 5--2.87 mills
Public Health Unit Maintenance--1.5 mills/ 1980
Roads & Bridges--8 mills/March 30, 1985
School Parishwide Maintenance--10 mills/ 1990
Assessment District
West Feliciana
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--6 mills/1986
Assessor's original millage
Winn
Law Enforcement District (Additional)--8 mills/1981
Assessor's original millage
Library -- 1979 millage
Library -- 3 mills/1999
C.(1) If the amount distributed to the tax collector and the city of New Orleans is
less than the amount required to reimburse tax losses on the basis of the tax rolls of the
current calendar year as provided in Subsection A of this Section, the tax collector and the
city of New Orleans shall prorate such lesser amount among the various tax recipient bodies
within the parish so that the lesser amount received by each tax recipient body shall be
proportionate to the reduction in the total amount distributed to each parish, and the amount
distributed by the state treasurer to the city treasurer of the city of Monroe shall be based
upon similar prorating, if necessary; however, in the parish of St. Bernard, the Lake Borgne
Levee District shall receive a minimum of $163,000 and the St. Bernard Port, Harbor and
Terminal District shall receive a minimum of $125,000 and, in Allen Parish the Special Law
Enforcement District shall receive a minimum of $58,000 and the Assessor shall receive a
minimum of $36,500.
Page 30 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
(2) No bond millages levied to service bonds under the authority of Louisiana
Constitution Article VI, Section 33(B) or Article XIV, Section 14 of the Louisiana
Constitution of 1921 or any other constitutional or statutory authority for the issuance of
general obligation bonds shall share in the proceeds of this Act and the governing authority
of the issuing political subdivision shall levy and collect or cause to be levied and collected
on all taxable property in the political subdivision ad valorem taxes sufficient to pay
principal and interest and redemption premiums, if any, on such bonds as they mature; the
only exceptions to this prohibition shall be specifically included in this Subsection. In the
parish of Natchitoches, bond millages shall share and any tax recipient body in said parish
otherwise eligible to participate in the revenue sharing fund may use the funds for the
retirement of the principal, interest, or premium, if any, or any combination thereof, of any
outstanding bonded indebtedness of such tax recipient body. In the parish of Livingston the
millage authorized in 1975 for the parish health unit shall share as an operation and
maintenance millage. In the parish of Avoyelles, the Ward 7 School District Construction
Tax and the Ward 10 School District Construction Tax shall each share as an operation and
maintenance millage. In the parish of DeSoto, the 150 mills authorized for School District
#2 shall share as an operation and maintenance millage. In the parish of East Baton Rouge,
the BREC Capital Improvement Tax shall share as an operation and maintenance millage.
Bond millages may share in the parish of Sabine; however, if there are no excess funds those
millages levied for operation and maintenance of those taxing districts eligible for
reimbursement shall have priority for reimbursement to the extent that funds are available.
In the parish of Bossier, bond millages and operation and maintenance millages shall share
on a pro rata basis and the school bonds listed in Section 9(B)(3) shall share as provided
therein.
(3) In the parish of St. Tammany, the parish governing authority shall make
available out of its allocated funds a sufficient amount for the operation and maintenance of
the food stamp offices and the service office for veterans established under R.S. 29:261. In
the parish of St. Tammany, the parish governing authority shall make available out of its
allocated funds five thousand dollars for the St. Tammany Humane Society. In the event of
any decrease in the state's appropriated portion of the salaries of the St. Tammany Parish
Registrar of Voters Office, the parish governing authority shall make available out of its
Page 31 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
allocated funds a sufficient amount to replace such state funds, not to exceed $15,537.58.
Of the funds allocated within the parish of St. Charles, thirty thousand dollars shall be
distributed to the St. Charles Department of Community Services to be used for the
operation of an outreach program at the St. Rose Community Center. Of the funds allocated
within the parish of Acadia, $180,000 shall be distributed to the law enforcement district.
Section 10. In the event the distribution to the tax collector in each parish and to the
city of New Orleans is more than the amount necessary to satisfy the requirements of
Sections 6 and 7 of this Act and to reimburse all tax recipient bodies as set forth in Section
9 of this Act, then the city of New Orleans and the tax collector in each parish, within fifteen
days after receipt thereof, shall distribute such remaining excess amount as follows, except
as otherwise provided in Subsection D of this Section:
A. The portion of the excess equal to the ratio that the parish public school
population bears to the total population of the parish shall be allocated and distributed to the
respective city and parish school boards in the parish proportionate to the public school
population of each.
B. The next portion of the excess remaining after allocation and distribution to the
school boards, equal to the ratio that the total population of all incorporated areas in the
parish bears to the total parish population, shall be allocated and distributed to the respective
incorporated municipalities of the parish proportionate to the respective population of each.
C. The remaining portion of such excess, if any, after allocation and distribution to
the school boards and incorporated areas of a parish, shall be allocated and distributed to the
parish governing authority.
D. For purposes of this Subsection only, "tax recipient bodies" shall mean and
include any recipient of excess funds hereunder. In the following parishes the tax collector
thereof, or in Orleans Parish, the city of New Orleans, within fifteen days after receipt
thereof, shall distribute such excess amount as follows:
(1) In the parish of Plaquemines, one hundred percent thereof to the parish
governing authority.
(2) In the parishes of Cameron, St. Charles, and St. John the Baptist, seventy-five
percent thereof to the parish governing authority, and twenty-five percent thereof to the
parish school board.
Page 32 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
(3) In the city of New Orleans, seventy percent thereof to the city of New Orleans
and thirty percent thereof to the Orleans Parish School Board.
(4) In the parish of Jefferson, sixty percent thereof to the parish governing authority,
twenty-five percent thereof to the parish school board, and fifteen percent thereof to the
incorporated municipalities in the parish, to be distributed to such incorporated
municipalities pro rata on a population basis. However, no less than twenty-five percent of
the funds distributed to the parish governing authority in this Paragraph shall be utilized for
existing drainage projects and for providing for additional pumps for those projects and
excluding normal labor operating costs and other normal operational costs; such funds may
also be used to repair parish property damaged by storms.
(5) In the parishes of Acadia, Bienville, East Feliciana, Franklin, Jackson, St.
Helena, St. James, Vernon, Washington, and West Feliciana, fifty percent thereof to the
parish governing authority, twenty-five percent thereof to the parish school board except that
in the parish of Washington, which has a dual parish and city school administration, the
twenty-five percent to the school boards shall be prorated between the parish and city school
systems on the basis of public school population, and twenty-five percent thereof to the
incorporated municipalities in the parish, to be distributed to such incorporated
municipalities pro rata on a population basis, except that in the parish of West Feliciana the
initial fifteen thousand dollars of such excess shall be retained by the sheriff and the
twenty-five percent for incorporated municipalities shall be distributed to the town of St.
Francisville. In the parish of East Feliciana, the initial twenty-five thousand dollars of such
excess shall be retained by the sheriff.
(6) In the parish of Jefferson Davis, the portion of the excess equal to the ratio that
the public school population of the parish bears to the total population of the parish shall be
allocated and paid to the Jefferson Davis Parish School Board, ten thousand dollars shall be
allocated and paid to the Assessor for Jefferson Davis Parish, and of the remainder of the
excess, fifty percent thereof to the parish governing authority and fifty percent thereof to the
incorporated municipalities in the parish, two thousand one hundred dollars to be distributed
to each incorporated municipality and the balance thereof to be distributed to such
incorporated municipalities pro rata on a population basis.
Page 33 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
(7) In the parish of St. Landry, thirty thousand dollars to the parish school board for
the operation of two food processing plants and the remainder as follows: twenty-five
percent to the sheriff for the operation and maintenance of his office; twenty-five percent to
the parish school board for use by the school board; twenty-five percent to the municipalities
of the parish, out of which five hundred dollars shall first be given to each municipality and
the balance shall be distributed to the municipalities on the basis of the formula applying to
the distribution of the tobacco tax; and twenty-five percent to the parish governing authority.
(8) In the parishes of Catahoula and Concordia, forty-four percent thereof to the
parish governing authority, thirty-three percent thereof to the parish school board, and
twenty-three percent thereof to the incorporated municipalities in the parish, to be distributed
to such incorporated municipalities pro rata on a population basis; prior to the distribution
of any excess funds in Concordia Parish, the parish libraries therein shall be reimbursed an
amount equal to any increase in the sheriff's commission deducted from library taxes over
and above the percentage authorized to be deducted in the 1975 calendar year; and the
balance of the excess shall be distributed as provided in this Paragraph. However, in the
parish of Catahoula, the tax collector shall retain the sum of seventeen thousand dollars of
the excess, in addition to the commission provided in Section 6 of this Act, and the balance
of the excess shall be distributed as provided in this Paragraph; and further, in the parish of
Concordia, the tax collector shall retain the sum of thirty-five thousand dollars of the excess,
in addition to the commission provided in Section 6 of this Act, and the balance of the excess
shall be distributed as provided in this Paragraph.
(9) In the parishes of Sabine and Tangipahoa, forty percent thereof to the parish
governing authority, thirty percent thereof to the parish school board, and thirty percent
thereof to the incorporated municipalities in the parish, to be distributed to such incorporated
municipalities pro rata on a population basis.
(10) In the parishes of Tensas and Winn, thirty-five percent thereof to the parish
governing authority, thirty-five percent thereof to the parish school board, and thirty percent
thereof to the incorporated municipalities in the parish, to be distributed to such incorporated
municipalities pro rata on a population basis.
(11) In the parishes of Allen, Avoyelles, Bossier, Claiborne, DeSoto, East Carroll,
Evangeline, Iberia, Lafayette, Lincoln, Madison, Rapides, Richland, St. Martin, St. Mary,
Page 34 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
Union, Webster, and West Carroll, thirty-three and one-third percent thereof to the parish
governing authority, thirty-three and one-third percent thereof to the parish school board, and
thirty-three and one-third percent thereof to the incorporated municipalities in the parish, to
be distributed to such incorporated municipalities pro rata on a population basis. Further,
in the parish of Evangeline the additional excess funds received by the school board as a
result of the change in percentages from those provided in Act 719 of the 1975 Regular
Session of the Louisiana Legislature shall be used solely for the purpose of restoring the
salaries or benefits to those school board employees to the same level or amount as were
paid prior to the recent reductions or decreases in such salaries or benefits; however, if the
excess funds are insufficient to restore the salaries or benefits to their former level or
amount, then the excess funds shall be distributed on a pro rata basis. In the parish of
Lafayette, the initial distribution shall be sixty thousand dollars to the Lafayette Association
for Retarded Citizens, Incorporated, for operating expenses, one hundred seventy thousand
dollars to the Lafayette Parish Sheriff, and the balance of the excess shall be distributed as
provided above in this Paragraph. In the parish of Union, the initial distribution shall be six
thousand dollars to the Spencer-West Sterlington Fire Protection District, Incorporated, for
operating expenses; thereafter, the sheriff and ex officio tax collector shall retain the sum of
fifty thousand dollars of the excess, in addition to the commission provided in Section 6 of
this Act, and the balance of the excess shall be distributed as provided above in this
Paragraph. In the parish of St. Mary, the parish governing authority shall make available out
of its allocated excess funds a sufficient amount to the parish registrar of voters to pay the
expenses of voter canvass required by law. In the parish of East Carroll the tax collector
shall retain the sum of fifteen thousand dollars of the excess, in addition to the commission
provided in Section 6 of this Act, and the balance of the excess shall be distributed as
provided above in this Paragraph. In the parish of Claiborne the tax collector may retain up
to an aggregate of ten percent of the excess as agreed to by resolution passed by the parish
governing authority before receiving its part designated in this Paragraph, by resolution
passed by the parish school board before receiving its part as designated in this Paragraph,
and a resolution from each municipality in said parish; each of the above bodies in Claiborne
Parish may provide the same or a different percentage for the sheriff but not to exceed ten
percent of its share. In the parish of Webster the tax collector may retain up to an aggregate
Page 35 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
of ten percent of the excess to be received by the cities of Minden and Springhill and upon
passage of resolutions authorizing same by respective governing authorities may retain
amounts fixed in the resolution not to exceed ten percent of excess received by the police
jury of Webster Parish and each of the other incorporated municipalities in Webster Parish.
(12) In the parishes of Iberville, Pointe Coupee, and West Baton Rouge, thirty-three
and one-third percent thereof to the parish governing authority, thirty-three and one-third
percent thereof to the parish school board, and thirty-three and one-third percent thereof of
such excess amount to the incorporated municipalities in the parish, in the same amounts of
funds as were distributed to each in 1972 under the provisions of Act 4 of the 1972
Extraordinary Session except:
(a) If the amount of excess funds is insufficient to supply the amounts distributed
in 1972 to each incorporated municipality in the parish, the amount to be allocated and
distributed to each incorporated municipality shall be reduced by the ratio that the amount
of excess funds distributed to it in 1972 under Act 4 of the 1972 Extraordinary Session bore
to the total amount of excess funds then so distributed to all of the incorporated
municipalities in the parish; or
(b) If the amount of such excess funds exceeds the amount necessary to supply the
same amounts of excess funds distributed in 1972 to each incorporated municipality in the
parish, the excess over the amounts distributed in 1972 shall be allocated and distributed to
each incorporated municipality in the parish in the ratio that the population in each bears to
the total population of all of the incorporated municipalities in the parish.
However, in the parish of Pointe Coupee, the sheriff shall retain the sum of ten
thousand dollars of such excess amount, in addition to the commission provided in Section
6 of this Act, to be used for the operation and maintenance of his department, and the
balance of the excess shall be distributed as provided above in this Paragraph.
(13) In the parish of Ouachita, the funds shall be distributed as follows: thirty-three
percent thereof to the parish governing authority, thirty percent thereof to the city and parish
school boards to be prorated between the city and parish school boards on the basis of public
school population, and thirty-seven percent thereof to the incorporated municipalities in the
parish, to be distributed to such incorporated municipalities pro rata on a population basis.
Page 36 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
(14) In the parish of Caddo, twenty-five percent thereof to the parish governing
authority, thirty-five percent thereof to the parish school board, and forty percent thereof to
the incorporated municipalities in the parish, to be distributed to such incorporated
municipalities pro rata on a population basis.
(15) In the parish of East Baton Rouge, such excess amount shall be distributed to
the East Baton Rouge Parish School Board, the East Baton Rouge City-Parish Government,
the town of Zachary, the city of Baker and the East Baton Rouge Parish Recreation
Commission in proportion to the ad valorem taxes collected by or reimbursed to each and
sales taxes collected by each in the twelve-month period ending June 30, 1974, and every
subsequent twelve-month period. However, twenty thousand dollars of such excess funds
shall be dedicated to each of the following volunteer fire departments: Pride, Sharon Hills,
Central, Brownsfield and East Side.
(16) In the parish of Calcasieu, thirty-three and one-third percent thereof to the
parish governing authority, thirty-three and one-third percent thereof to the parish school
board, and thirty-three and one-third percent thereof to the incorporated municipalities in the
parish, two thousand one hundred dollars to be distributed to each incorporated municipality
and the balance thereof to be distributed to such incorporated municipalities pro rata on a
population basis.
(17) In the parish of Beauregard, forty percent thereof to the parish governing
authority, thirty-five percent thereof to the parish school board, and twenty-five percent
thereof to the incorporated municipalities in the parish, to be distributed to such incorporated
municipalities pro rata on a population basis.
(18) In the parish of Morehouse, one-third thereof to the parish school board,
one-third thereof to the parish governing authority, and one-third thereof to the incorporated
municipalities in the parish, to be distributed to such incorporated municipalities pro rata on
a population basis.
(19) In the parish of Grant, fifty percent thereof to the sheriff and fifty percent
thereof to the parish governing authority.
(20) In the parish of Lafourche, one hundred percent thereof to the parish governing
authority, the first two hundred thousand dollars of which shall be used for existing parish
roads.
Page 37 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
(21) In the parishes of Caldwell and LaSalle, one-third thereof to the parish
governing authority, one-third thereof to the parish school board, and one-third thereof to
the incorporated municipalities in the parish, to be distributed to such incorporated
municipalities pro rata on a population basis. Prior to the distribution of any excess funds
in LaSalle Parish, one thousand dollars shall be disbursed to the Hardtner Medical Center,
a publicly owned hospital, to be donated to the Medical Scholarship Fund, and five thousand
dollars shall be disbursed to the LaSalle Association for the Developmentally Delayed,
however, none of these monies are to be used for salaries and provided that this amount is
spent to directly assist the students, and the balance of the excess shall be distributed as
provided above in this Paragraph.
(22) In the parish of Rapides, the initial fifteen thousand dollars of such excess shall
be paid over to the town of Ball, and the remainder of the excess shall be divided as follows:
thirty-three and one-third percent thereof to the parish governing authority, thirty-three and
one-third percent thereof to the parish school board, and thirty-three and one-third percent
thereof to the incorporated municipalities pro rata on a population basis.
(23) In the parish of Vermilion, sixty percent to the sheriff and forty percent to the
Vermilion Parish assessor.
(24) In the parish of Red River, the initial distribution shall be two thousand five
hundred dollars to the National Guard Armory located in said parish and the balance of the
excess shall be distributed as provided in Subsections A, B, and C of this Section.
(25) In the parish of Assumption, the first twenty thousand dollars of excess shall
be distributed to the Assumption Parish Assessor, with the residual being distributed as
provided in Subsections A, B, and C of this Section.
E. In the parishes of Allen and Cameron, such excess amounts shall not be expended
until the parish or expending authority or agency has received the approval of a majority of
the legislative delegation representing the parish, the senators and representatives each
having an equal vote, provided that if there is a tie vote, the parish or expending authority
or agency shall have one vote in order to break the tie vote.
F. In order to provide flexibility in the use of excess funds, no excess funds shall be
distributed to any recipient by the tax collector of the parish of Evangeline as provided in
this Section until approval of such distribution of excess funds to each recipient thereof has
Page 38 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
been granted by the member or members of the House of Representatives and the Senate
who represent the parish in the legislature. Such approval shall be requested by the chief
executive officer of the recipient body who shall submit to the respective members of the
legislature a written request for such excess funds, such written request to contain the
amount of excess funds requested and the purpose for which they will be expended. Upon
receipt, but only upon receipt, by the tax collector of the written approval of such a request
from each of the members of the legislature who represent the parish, the tax collector of the
parish shall make the distribution requested provided that such distribution is in compliance
with the provisions of this Act and particularly other provisions of this Section.
Section 11. The parish governing authority shall have the power and authority to
expend such excess funds received by it for any governmental purpose or function and may
allocate and distribute any portion of such excess funds received by it to its tax recipient
bodies, sheriff, other taxing districts, incorporated municipalities, and other public officials.
Section 12. In accordance with the provisions of this Act, the amount to be
distributed to each parish and to the city of New Orleans during the Fiscal Year 2026-2027
shall be as follows:
Total Due Sheriff's Retirement
PARISH FY 2026-2027 Fund Contribution
ACADIA $1,030,980 $147,113 $21,182
ALLEN $410,585 $72,915 $9,610
ASCENSION $2,411,470 $126,590 $19,927
ASSUMPTION $362,904 $85,939 $8,072
AVOYELLES $693,251 $124,617 $16,407
BEAUREGARD $666,303 $83,078 $11,795
BIENVILLE $228,084 $58,806 $8,194
BOSSIER $3,436,082 $168,228 $46,147
CADDO $6,015,934 $541,683 $209,896
CALCASIEU $3,688,213 $465,611 $122,417
CALDWELL $177,853 $46,670 $6,454
CAMERON $95,092 $49,136 $8,092
CATAHOULA $158,276 $46,176 $6,130
Page 39 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
CLAIBORNE $245,301 $53,576 $6,595
CONCORDIA $320,485 $72,027 $9,832
DESOTO $508,020 $53,971 $7,061
EAST BATON ROUGE $10,676,799 $702,314 $242,306
EAST CARROLL $120,306 $43,710 $6,696
EAST FELICIANA $353,178 $48,248 $4,815
EVANGELINE $576,208 $72,027 $10,621
FRANKLIN $350,884 $72,126 $15,315
GRANT $407,212 $60,582 $7,222
IBERIA $1,212,884 $219,140 $37,367
IBERVILLE $725,351 $137,246 $16,387
JACKSON $280,088 $64,430 $10,014
JEFFERSON $7,585,749 $1,313,459 $280,320
JEFFERSON DAVIS $569,283 $68,376 $15,497
LAFAYETTE $4,152,967 $303,994 $57,517
LAFOURCHE $1,523,913 $190,231 $39,612
LASALLE $1,119,689 $54,070 $7,061
LINCOLN $835,970 $71,731 $18,653
LIVINGSTON $3,728,314 $165,662 $26,745
MADISON $157,491 $43,710 $8,113
MOREHOUSE $432,630 $98,766 $18,349
NATCHITOCHES $644,205 $105,771 $15,679
ORLEANS $5,921,366 $0 $0
OUACHITA $2,807,971 $269,954 $64,739
PLAQUEMINES $395,358 $141,686 $25,107
POINTE COUPEE $367,128 $63,246 $8,537
RAPIDES $2,290,941 $320,669 $75,886
RED RIVER $135,926 $41,539 $2,976
RICHLAND $359,626 $64,627 $13,818
SABINE $405,535 $67,587 $10,459
ST. BERNARD $803,328 $342,079 $60,794
Page 40 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
ST. CHARLES $910,635 $104,587 $19,401
ST. HELENA $204,143 $44,006 $5,887
ST. JAMES $353,389 $91,563 $15,355
ST. JOHN $988,715 $116,822 $14,243
ST. LANDRY $1,455,663 $270,348 $40,725
ST. MARTIN $804,506 $110,606 $12,665
ST. MARY $864,683 $186,974 $36,942
ST. TAMMANY $5,593,315 $271,532 $48,473
TANGIPAHOA $2,507,123 $273,604 $37,690
TENSAS $77,973 $33,843 $5,381
TERREBONNE $1,862,865 $220,324 $44,002
UNION $380,560 $58,214 $8,274
VERMILION $1,044,997 $120,374 $20,312
VERNON $809,354 $160,532 $22,497
WASHINGTON $810,512 $133,102 $18,653
WEBSTER $648,149 $105,377 $22,881
WEST BATON ROUGE $512,153 $73,704 $10,439
WEST CARROLL $168,538 $45,782 $9,428
WEST FELICIANA $355,850 $39,862 $3,803
WINN $257,744 $62,456 $7,627
TOTAL $90,000,000 $9,866,728 $2,023,094
Section 13. The state treasurer shall distribute one-third of the total amount herein
allocated to the parishes from the revenue sharing fund to the parish tax collector, or in
Orleans Parish to the city of New Orleans, not later than the first day of December in each
year, one-third thereof not later than the fifteenth day of March in each year and one-third
thereof not later than the fifteenth day of May in each year, and each one-third of the total
allocation shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of Sections 6, 7, 9, and 10
of this Act; however, the legislative auditor may authorize the granting of additional sums
due any recipient in advance upon a showing that the advance receipt of such funds is
reasonably necessary. If the state treasurer does not distribute the fund on or before the dates
specified in this Act, any interest or other income derived by the state from the parish
Page 41 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
allocations, earned prior to the distribution to the parishes, shall be paid over a pro rata basis
together with the principal amounts due the parishes under the provisions of this Act. Any
interest or other income derived by the parish tax collector or the city of New Orleans from
the investment or other use of such total parish allocations received from the state treasurer,
earned prior to the distributions within the parish as required by the foregoing provisions of
this Act, shall be paid over a pro rata basis together with the principal amounts due the local
recipients under the provisions of this Act upon distribution thereto, and the parish tax
collectors or the city of New Orleans may retain only investment income earned on that
portion of the total parish allocation to which they are otherwise entitled under the provisions
of this Act. In light of the fact that all assessment roll figures will not be available in time
to base the December distribution by the treasurer on current figures, the distribution of
funds on the first day of December pursuant to this Act shall be based on the distribution
figures for Fiscal Year 2025-2026. The remaining two distributions on the fifteenth day of
March and the fifteenth day of May shall be based on current figures for Fiscal Year
2026-2027, and such distributions shall be adjusted to compensate for the differences
resulting in the use of the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 figures for the December distribution.
Section 14. On or before such date as shall be established by the state treasurer, each
tax collector, the city of New Orleans, and the city treasurer of the city of Monroe annually
shall file with the state treasurer, on such forms as the state treasurer may require, all
information necessary to the computation of the funds to be distributed within the parishes,
including, but not limited to, a listing of all such local entities seeking eligibility for funds
as a tax recipient body under the qualifications set out in Section 1(A) of this Act, all new
millages of such tax recipient bodies as are listed in Section 9(B) of this Act, and all
remaining authorities on the tax rolls which are otherwise ineligible to participate in the
distribution of revenue sharing funds as tax recipient bodies. The listing shall include such
verification for eligibility as may be required by the state treasurer and, notwithstanding the
provisions of Section 12 of this Act, no revenue sharing funds shall be distributed prior to
receipt and acceptance by the state treasurer of such information and verification. The same
authorities shall in the same manner submit to the state treasurer a statement of the amount
of revenue sharing funds distributed to each recipient of such funds, including the amount
deducted for sheriffs' commissions and for retirement system contributions and shall state
Page 42 of 43

HB NO. 314 ENROLLED
clearly on such forms the amount of the distribution to each such recipient which is derived
from excess funds and the amount of such distribution which represents reimbursement for
tax losses by reasons of the homestead exemption. Such statement shall also include the
amount of any revenue sharing funds which remain to be distributed and the recipients to
which such remaining funds will be distributed.
Section 15. The state treasurer is hereby authorized and directed to make any
correction due to an error in the formula within this Act as are necessary and shall submit
any such adjustment to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget for approval. Any
such adjustment shall not cause the total amount of the appropriation under this Act to
exceed ninety million dollars.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 43 of 43